en: Corrugated cardboard
xx: 20 PAP, PAP 20, 20PAP, PAP20, 20 C PAP, 20 C PCB
bg: Вълнообразен картон
ca: Cartró ondulat
cs: vlnitá lepenka
de: Wellpappe
es: cartón ondulado, cartón corrugado
fi: aaltopahvi
fr: Carton ondulé, Cellulosique / Carton ondulé
hr: valovita ljepenka
it: cartone ondulato
nb: Bølgepapp
nl: golfkarton
pt: cartão ondulado
ro: Carton ondulat
ru: гофрокартон
sv: wellpapp
tr: Oluklu mukavva
uk: гофрокартон

en: Non-corrugated cardboard
xx: 21 PAP, PAP 21, 21PAP, PAP21
bg: Друг картон
de: Ungewellte Pappe, Nicht gewellte Pappe, Sonstige Pappe, Andere Pappe
es: Cartón no ondulado, Cartón no corrugado
fr: Carton non ondulé, carton plat, Cellulosique / Carton plat
hr: ravna ljepenka
it: Cartone non ondulato

en: Armed cardboard
bg: Въоръжен картон
ca: Cartó armat
cs: Ozbrojený karton
da: Armeret pap
de: Bewehrter Karton
es: Cartón armado, cartón piedra
et: Reljeefne kartong
fi: Vahvistettu pahvi
fr: Carton armé, Cellulosique / Carton armé
ga: Cairtchlár armtha
hr: Oklopljeni karton
hu: Fegyveres karton
it: Cartone armato
lt: Ginkluotas kartonas
lv: Ieroču kartons
mk: наоружан картон
nl: Gewapend karton
pl: Karton zbrojony
pt: Cartão armado
ro: Carton armat
ru: Вооруженный картон
sv: Armerad kartong
uk: Озброєний картон

en: Recycled cardboard, 100% recycled cardboard
da: Genbrugspap
de: Recycelte Pappe, Recyclingpappe, Recycelter Karton, Recyclingkarton
es: Cartón reciclado, 100% cartón reciclado
fr: Carton recyclé, carton recyclé 100%, carton 100% recyclé
hu: Újrahasznosított hullámpapír, újrahasznosított karton
it: Cartone riciclato, 100% cartone riciclato
nl: Recycled karton
pt: Cartão reciclado, cartão ondulado reciclado, cartonado reciclado, cartonada reciclada, papelão reciclado, cartolina reciclada, papel grosso reciclado

en: FSC cardboard
de: FSC Karton, FSC Pappe
es: Cartón FSC
fr: Carton FSC
it: Cartone FSC
ja: FSCカードボード
nl: FSC karton
pl: Karton FSC
pt: Cartão FSC
ro: Carton FSC
ru: Картон FSC
sv: FSC kartong
zh: FSC纸板

en: Grass carton
de: Graskarton

en: Paper
xx: 22 PAP, PAP 22, 22PAP, PAP22
bg: Хартия
da: Papir
de: Papier
es: Papel, 22 PAP
fr: Papier, papier standard, Cellulosique / Papier / Vélin
hr: papir
hu: Papír
it: Carta
ja: 紙
nl: Papier
pl: papier
pt: Papel
ru: Бумага
sv: Papper

en: baking paper, parchment paper
bg: Пергаментова хартия
ca: Paper vegetal
cs: pečicí papír
da: bagepapir
de: Backpapier
el: λαδόκολλα
es: papel sulfurizado, papel de horno, papel para hornear
fi: leivinpaperi
fr: Papier sulfurisé, papier cuisson, papier parchemin
hu: sütőpapír
is: Smjörpappír
it: Carta da forno, cartaforno
lv: pergamentpapīrs
nb: bakepapir
nl: bakpapier
pl: Papier do pieczenia
pt: papel vegetal, papel manteiga
ru: Пергаментная бумага
sv: Bakplåtspapper
tr: Fırın kâğıdı
uk: Пергаментний папір

en: Cellulose
bg: Целулоза
es: Celulosa
fr: Cellulose, Cellulose moulée, Cellulosique / Cellulose moulée, Cellulosique / Autres fibres cellulosiques / végétales
it: Cellulosa

en: Rubber
bg: Каучук
de: Gummi, Cellulosique / Gummi
es: Goma, Caucho, Celulósico / Caucho
fr: Caoutchouc, Cellulosique / Caoutchouc
it: Gomma, Cellulosico / Gomma
ja: ゴム, Cellulosique / ゴム
nl: Rubber, Cellulosique / Rubber
pl: Guma, Cellulosique / Guma
pt: Borracha, Celulósico / Borracha
ru: Резина, Cellulosique / Резина
zh: 橡胶, Cellulosique / 橡胶

en: Paperboard
xx: 23 PBD, PBD 23, 23 PPB, PPB 23, PPB, PBD
es: Cartón duro, cartulina
fi: Kartonki
fr: Papier cartonné
hr: ljepenka
hu: Kartonpapír, Karton, Papírkarton
it: Cartoncino
pt: Papel cartonado

en: Other paper
de: Sonstiges Papier, Anderes Papier
es: Otros tipos de papel
fr: Autres papiers, autre papier, Cellulosique / Autre papier
hu: Egyéb papír, más papír
it: Altra carta
nl: Ander karton
pt: Outro papel, outros papéis

en: Recycled paper, 100% recycled paper
bg: Рециклирана хартия
da: Genbrugspapir
de: Recyceltes Papier, Recyclingpapier, 100% recyceltes Papier, 100% Recyclingpapier
es: Papel reciclado, 100% papel reciclado
fr: Papier recyclé, papier recyclé 100%, papier 100% recyclé
hu: Újrahasznosított papír
it: Carta riciclata, 100% carta riciclata, carta 100% riciclata
nl: Recycled papier
pt: Papel reciclado, 100% papel reciclado, papel 100% reciclado

en: FSC paper
de: FSC Papier
es: Papel FSC
fr: Papier FSC
it: Carta FSC
nl: FSC-papier
pl: Papier FSC
pt: Papel FSC
ru: Бумага FSC
sv: FSC-papper

en: Kraft paper, kraft
bg: Крафт хартия
cs: Kraftový papír
da: Kraftpapir
de: Kraftpapier
el: Χαρτί Kraft
es: Papel de saco
et: Kraftpaber
fi: Kraft-paperi
fr: Papier kraft, kraft
hr: natronski papir
hu: Kraft papír
it: Carta kraft
lt: Krafto popierius
lv: Kraft papīrs
mk: Крафт хартија
nb: Kraftpapir
nl: Kraft-papier
nn: Kraftpapir
pl: Papier kraft
pt: Papel kraft, kraft
ru: Крафт-бумага
sv: Kraftpapper
tr: Kraft kağıdı
uk: Крафт-папір
zh: 牛皮纸

en: Wax
bg: Восък
ca: cera
cs: vosk
da: Voks
de: Wachs
el: κερί
es: cera
et: Vahad
fi: vaha
fr: Cire
ga: Céir
hr: vosak
hu: Viasz
is: Vax
it: cera
lt: Vaškas
lv: vaski
mk: восок
nb: voks
nl: Was
nn: voks
pl: woski
pt: cera
ro: ceară
ru: воск
sk: Vosk
sl: vosek
sr: vosak, восак
sv: vax
uk: віск

en: Metal, Metals
bg: Метал, метали
da: Metal, Metaller
de: Metall, Metalle
es: Metal, Metales
fr: Métal, Métaux, métallique, métalliques, Autres métaux (dont métaux non magnétiques)
hr: metale
hu: Fém, fémek
it: Metallo, Metalli
nl: Metaal, Metalen
pl: Metal, Metale
pt: Metais
ru: Металл
sv: metall

en: Recyclable Metals
bg: Рециклируеми метали
de: Wiederverwertbare Metalle, Wiederverwertbares Metall, Recycelbares Metall, Recycelbare Metalle
es: Metales Reciclables
fr: Métaux recyclables
hu: Újrahasznosítható fémek
it: Metalli riciclabili
nl: Recyclebaar metaal
pl: Metal do recyclingu
pt: Metais recicláveis
ru: Перерабатываемые металлы
sv: Återvinningsbara metaller
uk: Перероблювані метали
zh: 可回收金属

en: Steel, iron
xx: 40 FE, FE 40
bg: Стомана, желязо
da: Stål
de: Stahl
es: Acero, hierro
fr: Acier, fer, Métaux / Acier et fer (magnétiques)
hr: čelik
hu: Acél
it: Acciaio
ja: スチール
nl: IJzer, Staal
pl: Żelazo, Stal
pt: Aço
ru: Сталь

en: Tin-plated steel
ca: Llauna
de: Weißblech, Weissblech
es: hojalata
eu: Latorri
fr: Fer blanc
hu: fehérbádog
it: latta
nl: blik
pt: folha de flandres
ru: жесть
sv: Bleck
tr: Teneke
uk: Бляха